en: Marshmallows, Marshmallow, Marshmallow candies, Marshmallow candy
bg: Маршмелоу
da: Marshmallows
de: Marshmallows, Mäusespeck
es: Malvavisco
fi: vaahtokarkit, Vaahtokarkkeja
fr: Guimauves, pâtes de guimauves, Chamallows, Guimauve, Marshmallows, Marshmallow
hr: Marshmallows
it: Marshmallow
ja: マシュマロ
lt: Zefyrai, zefyras, zefyriniai saldainiai, zefyrinis saldainis
nl: Marshmallows, Zoete Spekjes, Marshmellows
nn: Marshmallows
pl: Pianki marshmallow
sv: Skum

en: Halva
be: Халва
bg: Халва
de: Halva, Halwa, Helva
es: Halva
fr: Halvas, Halwas, Helvas, Halva, Halwa, Helva
hr: Halva
it: Halva
ja: ハルヴァ
lt: Chalva
nl: Halva
pl: Chałwa, Chałwy
ru: Халва
sv: Helva
tr: Helva
uk: Халва
zh: 哈尔瓦酥糖

en: Sesame halva, Tahini halva
bg: Сусамова халва
de: Sesamhalva, Halva mit Sesam
fr: Halvas au sésame, Halva au sésame, Helvas au sésame, Helva au sésame, Halwas au sésame, Halwa au sésame
hr: Halva od sezama
lt: Sezamų chalva
nl: Sesamzaad-halva
pl: Chałwa sezamowa, Chałwy sezamowe
ru: Кунжутная халва, Халва кунжутная, Тахинная халва, Халва тахинная

en: Sunflower halva
bg: Слънчогледова халва
de: Halva mit Sonnenblumenkernen
fr: Halvas au tournesol, Halvas de tournesol, Halva de tournesol, Halva au tournesol
hr: Suncokretova halva
lt: Saulėgrąžų chalva
pl: Chałwa słonecznikowa, Chałwy słonecznikowe
ru: Подсолнечная халва, Халва подсолнечная

en: Turkish delight, lokums, lokum, loukoumi
bg: Локум
de: Lokum, Turkish Delight
es: Rahat lokum, delicia turca
fr: Loukoums, Loukoum, rahat loukoum
hr: Turska delicija
ja: ロクム
tr: Lokumlar

en: Easter eggs
bg: Великденски яйца
da: Påskeæg
es: Huevos de Pascua
fi: Pääsiäismunat
fr: Œufs de Pâques, oeuf de pâques
hr: Uskrsna jaja
hu: Húsvéti tojás
it: Uova di pasqua
lt: Velykiniai kiaušiniai
nl: Paaseieren
pt: Ovos da páscoa
sv: Påskägg

en: Easter chocolate eggs, Chocolate Easter eggs
da: Påskechokoladeæg, Chokoladepåskeæg
de: Osterschokoladeneier
es: Huevos de Pascua de chocolate
fi: Pääsiäissuklaamunat
fr: Œufs de pâques en chocolat, Oeufs de pâques en chocolat, oeuf de pâques en chocolat
hu: Húsvéti csokoládé tojás
lt: Velykiniai šokoladiniai kiaušiniai
sv: Påskchokladägg, Chokladpåskägg

en: Filled chocolate eggs
de: Gefüllte Schokoladeneier
es: Huevos de chocolate rellenos
fr: Œufs en chocolat fourrés, oeufs en chocolat fourrés
hr: Punjena čokoladna jaja
lt: Pilnaviduriai šokoladiniai kiaušiniai

en: Hollow chocolate eggs
bg: Празни шоколадови яйца
de: Hohlkörper-Schokoladeneier
es: Huevos de chocolate huecos
fr: Œufs en chocolat creux, oeufs en chocolat creux
hr: Šuplja čokoladna jaja
lt: Tuščiaviduriai šokoladiniai kiaušiniai
nl: Holle chocolade-eieren
ru: Пустые шоколадные яйца

en: Chocolate letters
hr: Čokoladna slova
lt: Šokoladinės raidės
nl: Chocoladeletters

en: Festive foods
ca: Aliments festius
de: Festtagsessen
es: Alimentos festivos
fi: Juhlaruoat
fr: Aliments festifs
hr: Svečana jela
lt: Šventiniai maisto produktai
nl: Feestdagenproducten
ru: Праздничные продукты
zh: 节庆食品

en: Easter foods and drinks, Easter food
bg: Великденска храна
da: Påskemad og -drikke
es: Comida de Pascua
fi: Pääsiäisruoat
fr: Aliments de Pâques
hr: Uskrsna hrana
it: Cibi per Pasqua
lt: Velykų maistas
nl: Paasproducten
pt: Alimentos da páscoa
sv: Påskmat och -dryckor

en: Easter chocolates
da: Påskechokolader
de: Osterschokoladen
fr: Chocolats de Pâques, Chocolat de Pâques
hu: Húsvéti csokoládék
lt: Valykiniai šokoladai
sv: Påskchoklader

en: Christmas foods and drinks
bg: Коледни ястия и напитки
ca: Aliments i begudes de Nadal
de: Weihnachtliches Essen und Getränke
es: Gastronomía navideña, Gastronomía de Navidad
fi: Jouluruoat ja -juomat
fr: Aliments et boissons de Noël
he: מזון ומשקאות של חג המולד, מזון ומשקאות כריסמס
hr: Božićna jela i pića
hu: Karácsonyi ételek és italok
it: Cibi e bevande di Natale
lt: Kalėdinis maistas ir gėrimai
nl: Kerstvoedsel en - dranken
pt: Alimentos e bebidas de natal
ru: Рождественская еда и напитки

en: Christmas chocolates
de: Weihnachtsschokolade
es: Chocolates de navidad
fi: joulusuklaat
fr: Chocolats de Noël
hr: Božićne čokolade
it: Cioccolatini di Natale
lt: Kalėdiniai šokoladai
nl: Kerstmischocola
pt: Chocolates de Natal
ru: Рождественские шоколадные конфеты

en: Yule log, Christmas log cake
de: Weihnachtsbaumstamm Eisdessert
fr: Bûches de Noël
hr: Badnjak
it: torta tronchetto
ja: ユールログ

en: Ice cream logs, Ice cream log
fr: Bûches glacées, Bûche glacée

en: Advent calendars
de: Adventskalender
es: Calendarios de Adviento
fi: adventtikalenterit
fr: Calendriers de l'avent
hr: Adventski kalendari
it: Calendario dell'avvento
ja: アドベントカレンダー
lt: Advento kalendoriai
nl: Adventskalender
pl: Kalendarz adwentowy
pt: Calendário do Advento
ru: Рождественский календарь
zh: 圣诞倒数日历

en: Chocolate Advent calendars
ca: Calendari d'Advent de xocolata
de: Schokoladen-Adventskalender
es: Calendarios de Adviento de chocolate
fi: Suklaajoulukalenterit
fr: Calendriers de l'avent en chocolat
hr: Čokoladni adventski kalendari
it: Calendari dell'Avvento al cioccolato
lt: Šokoladiniai advento kalendoriai
nl: Chocolade adventkalenders
pt: Calendários do Advento de chocolate
ru: Шоколадные рождественские календари

en: Christmas sweets, Christmas confectionery
ca: Dolços de Nadal
da: Juleslik
de: Weihnachtssüßigkeiten, Weihnachtskonfekt
es: Dulces de Navidad, Dulces típicos de Navidad
fi: joulumakeiset
fr: Confiseries de Noël
hr: Božićni slatkiši
it: Dolci di Natale
lt: Kalėdiniai saldumynai, Kalėdiniai saldainiai
nl: Kerstbonbons
pt: Doces de natal
ru: Рождественские сладости